Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.567

Police forces for universities and The Evergreen State College—Benefits for duty-related death, disability or injury.

The boards of regents of the state universities and board of trustees of the regional universities and the board of trustees of The Evergreen State College are authorized and empowered, under such rules and regulations as any such board may prescribe for the duly sworn police officers employed by any such board as members of a police force established pursuant to RCW 28B.10.550, to provide for the payment of death or disability benefits or medical expense reimbursement for death, disability, or injury of any such duly sworn police officer who, in the line of duty, loses his or her life or becomes disabled or is injured, and for the payment of such benefits to be made to any such duly sworn police officer or his or her surviving spouse or the legal guardian of his or her child or children, as defined in RCW 41.26.030(6), or his or her estate: PROVIDED, That the duty-related benefits authorized by this section shall in no event be greater than the benefits authorized on June 25, 1976, for duty-related death, disability, or injury of a law enforcement officer under chapter 41.26 RCW: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the duty-related benefits authorized by this section shall be reduced to the extent of any amounts received or eligible to be received on account of the duty-related death, disability, or injury to any such duly sworn police officer, his or her surviving spouse, the legal guardian of his or her child or children, or his or her estate, under workers' compensation, social security including the changes incorporated under Public Law 89-97 as now or hereafter amended, or disability income insurance and health care plans under chapter 41.05 RCW.

[ 2011 c 336 s 713; 1987 c 185 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 26; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 81 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—1987 c 185: See notes following RCW 51.12.130.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.